Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.230

Waterway shoreline front—Lessee must lease abutting property.

If the city owns the land abutting upon any part of the area between the shore lines and dock lines, no portion of the area which has city owned property abutting upon it shall ever be leased unless an equal frontage of the abutting property immediately adjoining it is leased at the same time for the same period to the same individual or concern.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.56.230. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 17, part; RRS s 9465, part.]